Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 6. Transportation of Admitted Persons; Detention by Sheriff; Escape; Transfers.

§ 37.2-829.
Transportation of person in civil admission process.

When a person has volunteered for admission pursuant to §

37.2-814

or been ordered to be admitted to a facility under §§

37.2-815

through

37.2-821

, the judge or special justice shall determine after consideration of information provided by the person’s treating mental health professional and any involved community services board or behavioral health authority staff regarding the person’s dangerousness, whether transportation shall be provided by the sheriff or may be provided by an alternative transportation provider, including a family member or friend of the person, a representative of the community services board, a representative of the facility at which the person was detained pursuant to a temporary detention order, or other alternative transportation provider with personnel trained to provide transportation in a safe manner. If the judge or special justice determines that transportation may be provided by an alternative transportation provider, the judge or special justice may consult with the proposed alternative transportation provider either in person or via two-way electronic video and audio or telephone communication system to determine whether the proposed alternative transportation provider is available to provide transportation, willing to provide transportation, and able to provide transportation in a safe manner. If the judge or special justice finds that the proposed alternative transportation provider is available to provide transportation, willing to provide transportation, and able to provide transportation in a safe manner, the judge or special justice may order transportation by the proposed alternative transportation provider. In all other cases, the judge or special justice shall order transportation by the sheriff of the jurisdiction where the person is a resident unless the sheriff’s office of that jurisdiction is located more than 100 road miles from the nearest boundary of the jurisdiction in which the proceedings took place. In cases where the sheriff of the jurisdiction of which the person is a resident is more than 100 road miles from the nearest boundary of the jurisdiction in which the proceedings took place, it shall be the responsibility of the sheriff of the latter jurisdiction to transport the person.

If the judge or special justice determines that the person requires transportation by the sheriff, the person may be delivered to the care of the sheriff, as specified in this section, who shall transport the person to the proper facility. In no event shall transport commence later than six hours after notification to the sheriff or alternative transportation provider of the judge’s or special justice’s order.

If any state hospital has become too crowded to admit any such person, the Commissioner shall give notice of the fact to all community services boards and shall designate the facility to which sheriffs or alternative transportation providers shall transport such persons.

If an alternative transportation provider providing transportation of a person becomes unable to continue providing transportation of the person at any time after taking custody of the person, the primary law-enforcement agency for the jurisdiction in which the alternative transportation provider is located at the time he becomes unable to continue providing transportation shall take custody of the person and shall transport the person to the proper facility.

No person who provides alternative transportation pursuant to this section shall be liable to the person being transported for any civil damages for ordinary negligence in acts or omissions that result from providing such alternative transportation.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-71, 37-79, 37-116; 1950, pp. 904, 907; 1964, c. 640; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-71; 1970, c. 673; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 1972, c. 639; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 1987, c. 719; 1989, cc. 334, 534; 1990, c. 94; 1992, c. 419; 1995, c. 844; 1996, c. 184; 2003, c. 151; 2004, c. 737; 2005, c. 716; 2009, cc. 112, 697; 2015, cc. 297, 308; 2020, cc. 879, 880.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 112 and 697 are identical and rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 297 and 308 are identical, and added the last paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 879 and 880 are identical, and inserted the penultimate paragraph.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 473 (2009).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

The 100-road-mile qualification

in this section, applicable to sheriffs transporting persons certified for involuntarily admission to a hospital, applies also to magistrates directing the transportation of persons under emergency custody orders or temporary detention orders. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Lenny Millholland, Sheriff for the City of Winchester, 03-084, 2003 Va. AG LEXIS 45 (10/10/03) (decided under former § 37.1-71).

§ 37.2-830.
Repealed by Acts 2009, cc. 112 and 697, cl. 2.

Cross references.

Former §

37.2-830

, pertaining to custody of person ordered to be admitted for purpose of transportation, derived from Code 1950, § 37-79; 1950, p. 907; 1964, c. 640; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-72;
1976, c. 671;
1995, c. 844;
2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-831.
Detention in jail after order of admission.

It shall be unlawful for any sheriff, sergeant, or other officer to use any jail or other place of confinement for criminals as a place of detention for any person in his custody for transportation to a facility in accordance with this chapter, unless the person’s detention therein, for a period not to exceed 24 hours, is specifically authorized by the judge or special justice who ordered the admission, except that such authority shall not be given by any judge or special justice for the Counties of Augusta, Arlington, and Fairfax and the Cities of Alexandria, Fairfax, Falls Church, Waynesboro, and Staunton.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-78; 1950, p. 907; 1964, c. 640; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-73; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 1972, c. 751; 1976, c. 671; 1979, c. 707; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-832.
Persons with mental illness not to be confined in cells with criminals.

In no case shall any sheriff or jailer confine any person with mental illness in a cell or room with prisoners charged with or convicted of crimes.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-81; 1950, p. 908; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-74; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-833.
Escape, sickness, death, or discharge of a person ordered to be involuntarily admitted while in custody; warrant for person escaping.

If any person who has been ordered to be involuntarily admitted to a facility escapes, becomes too sick to travel, dies, or is discharged by due process of law while in the custody of a sheriff or other person, the sheriff or other person shall immediately notify the facility of that fact. If any person in the custody of a sheriff or other person pursuant to the provisions of this chapter escapes, the sheriff or other person having that person in custody shall immediately secure a warrant from any officer authorized to issue warrants charging the individual with escape from lawful custody, directing his apprehension, and stating what disposition shall be made of the person upon arrest.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-85; 1950, p. 908; 1954, c. 668; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-75; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 2005, c. 716.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Escape, § 1.

§ 37.2-834.
Arrest of certain persons involuntarily admitted.

If a person involuntarily admitted to a facility escapes, the director may forthwith issue a warrant directed to any officer authorized to make arrests, who shall arrest the person and carry him back to the facility or to an appropriate state facility that is in close proximity to the jurisdictions served by the arresting officer. The officer to whom the warrant is directed may execute the same in any part of the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-97; 1950, p. 39; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-76; 1972, c. 639; 1976, c. 671; 1981, c. 242; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-835.
Arrest without warrant.

Any officer authorized to make arrests is authorized to make an arrest under a warrant issued under the provisions of §

37.2-833

or

37.2-834

, without having the warrant in his possession, provided the warrant has been issued and the arresting officer has been advised of the issuance of the warrant by printed message or any form of wire or wireless communication containing the name of the person wanted, directing the disposition to be made of the person when apprehended, and stating the basis of the issuance of the warrant.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-97.1; 1954, c. 668; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-77; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-836.
Employees to accompany persons admitted voluntarily to facilities.

When application is made to the director of a facility for admission pursuant to §

37.2-805

, he may send an employee from the facility to accompany the person to the facility. If for any reason it is impracticable for an employee to do so, then the director may appoint some suitable person for the purpose, or may request the sheriff of the county or city in which the person resides to convey him to the facility. The sheriff or other person appointed for the purpose shall receive only his necessary expenses for conveying any person admitted to the facility. Expenses authorized herein shall be paid by the Department.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-87; 1950, p. 909; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-78; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 1972, c. 639; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716.